North Carolina, session 2025, HB673.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund the recurring sum of six
hundred fifty-six thousand dollars ($656,000) for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to
the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina to be allocated to the UNC Health
Care System solely for covering the aggregate costs of transportation services, including
ambulance services, for neonatal patients from a hospital in the UNC Health Care System to
another hospital in situations where insurance payors or insurance companies deny coverage for
transportation and mileage fees. The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina
shall submit an annual report to the General Assembly detailing the amount of funds expended,
the number of neonatal transports covered, and any other data deemed relevant regarding the
effectiveness of funding for the purpose in this act in reducing delays in neonatal care.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H673-v-1*